Hawaii, session 2025, HB1303.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature recognizes there is widespread use of wireless communication devices, including mobile phones and smart technology, in public schools across the State.  While these devices offer benefits such as facilitating communication and providing access to educational resources, they have also led to increasing distractions during instructional time that can negatively impact students' academic performance and focus.  Studies have shown that excessive use of wireless communication devices, particularly for non-academic purposes such as social media, contributes to mental health issues, including stress, anxiety, and sleep deprivation, further hindering students ability to learn and develop socially. The legislature finds that nationally, approximately eighty per cent of schools have implemented policies prohibiting the use of wireless communication devices for non-academic purposes during school hours, signaling a broad consensus on the need for such regulations.  Several states, including Florida, Louisiana, South Carolina, Virginia, and California, have adopted or proposed policies to limit or restrict cellphone use in schools.  These policies reflect an effort to balance students' need for access to technology during emergencies with the goal of fostering a focused, distraction-free academic environment. The legislature also finds that establishing guidelines for responsible technology use and promoting digital citizenship will support the academic success and mental well-being of students.  The legislature believes it is imperative that the State create a balance between maintaining access to wireless communication devices for safety and communication purposes, and promoting a healthier and more effective learning environment. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to regulate the use of wireless communication devices in the State's schools, ensuring that students can still access their devices in emergencies while minimizing distractions in the classroom. SECTION 2. Chapter 302A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part II, subpart C, to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§302A-    Wireless communication device policy; prohibition; exceptions.  (a)  Beginning with the 2025-2026 school year, each public school shall adopt and implement a wireless communication device policy that prohibits students from using wireless communication devices while in school during student hours and exempts from the policy the use of a wireless communication device: (1)  For educational purposes authorized by a teacher; (2)  If an emergency occurs; (3)  To manage a student's health care; (4)  In accordance with a student's individualized education program; and (5)  In accordance with a plan developed under section 504 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. 794). (b) Each school shall publish on its website the wireless communication device policy established under subsection (a). (c) For the purposes of this section: "Student hours" means the hours of the school year counted for purposes of section 302A-251; provided that "student hours" for public charter schools and multi-track public schools shall mean the hours of 8:00 a.m. to 2:30 p.m., unless otherwise defined by the wireless communication device policy of the applicable public charter school or multi-track public school. "Wireless communication device" means any portable wireless device that has the capability to provide voice, messaging, or other data communication between two or more parties, including a cellular telephone, tablet computer, laptop computer, smartwatch, or gaming device." SECTION 3. New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________